Idaho, session 2025, H0218.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 52, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-5233, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-5233. EXPIRATION ON RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. Agencies possessing the
statutory authority to promulgate rules that interpret, prescribe, imple-
ment, or enforce a statute passed on or after July 1, 2025, shall have ten
(10) years to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations related to such
statute. After ten (10) years, the agency may only promulgate new rules and
regulations related to the relevant statute after a substantive amendment
to the section or chapter by the legislature or following the addition of a
new statute that confers rulemaking authority, as long as the rulemaking is
started within two (2) years of the amendment or new statute.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.